Utah statutes.
10-9a-404.   Public hearing by planning commission on proposed general plan or amendment -- Notice -- Revisions to general plan or amendment -- Adoption or rejection by legislative body.

(1) (a)  After completing its recommendation for a proposed general plan, or proposal to amend the general plan, the planning commission shall schedule and hold a public hearing on the proposed plan or amendment.

(b)  The planning commission shall provide notice of the public hearing, as required by Section 10-9a-204.

(c)  After the public hearing, the planning commission may modify the proposed general plan or amendment.

(2)  The planning commission shall forward the proposed general plan or amendment to the legislative body.

(3)  The legislative body may make any revisions to the proposed general plan or amendment that it considers appropriate.

(4) (a)  The municipal legislative body may adopt or reject the proposed general plan or amendment either as proposed by the planning commission or after making any revision that the municipal legislative body considers appropriate.

(b)  If the municipal legislative body rejects the proposed general plan or amendment, it may provide suggestions to the planning commission for its consideration.

(5)  The legislative body shall adopt:

(a)  a land use element as provided in Subsection 10-9a-403(2)(a)(i);

(b)  a transportation and traffic circulation element as provided in Subsection 10-9a-403(2)(a)(ii); and

(c)  for all cities, after considering the factors included in Subsection 10-9a-403(2)(b)(ii), a plan to provide a realistic opportunity to meet estimated needs for additional moderate income housing if long-term projections for land use and development occur.

